Utah statutes.
32A-4-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Qualifications.
(1) (a)  The commission may not grant a restaurant liquor license to any
person who has been convicted of:
(i)  a felony under a federal or state law;
(ii) a violation of a federal or state law or local ordinance concerning the
sale, manufacture, distribution, warehousing, adulteration, or transportation
of alcoholic beverages;
(iii) a crime involving moral turpitude; or
(iv)  on two or more occasions within the five years before the day on which
the license is granted, driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and a drug.
(b)  In the case of a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company
the proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if any of the following has
been convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  a partner;
(ii)  a managing agent;
(iii)  a manager;
(iv)  an officer;
(v)  a director;
(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation; or
(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company.
(c)  The proscription under Subsection (1)(a) applies if a person employed to
act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for a restaurant has been
convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  The commission may immediately suspend or revoke a restaurant liquor
license if after the day on which the restaurant liquor license is granted, a
person described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is found to have been convicted of an offense described in Subsection
(1)(a) prior to the license being granted; or
(b)  on or after the day on which the license is granted:
(i)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or
(iii); or
(ii) (A)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and a drug; and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and a drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(A).
(3)  The director may take emergency action by immediately suspending the
operation of a restaurant liquor license according to the procedures and
requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, for the
period during which the criminal matter is being adjudicated if a person
described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c):
(a)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection (1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(b) (i)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, a drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and a drug;
and
(ii)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and a drug within five years before the day on
which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection (3)(b)(i).
(4) (a) (i)  The commission may not grant a restaurant liquor license to a
person who has had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(ii)  The commission may not grant a restaurant liquor license to an applicant
that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if a partner,
managing agent, manager, officer, director, stockholder who holds at least 20%
of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation, or
member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability company is or
was:
(A)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(B)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds or held at
least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had
any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within
the last three years; or
(C)  a manager or member who owns or owned at least 20% of a limited liability
company that had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this
title revoked within the last three years.
(b) An applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company may not be granted a restaurant liquor license if any of the following
had any type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked
while acting in that person's individual capacity within the last three years:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii) a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(c)  A person acting in an individual capacity may not be granted a restaurant
liquor license if that person was:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of a partnership that had any type of
license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the last
three years;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who held at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation that had any
type of license, agency, or permit issued under this title revoked within the
last three years; or
(iii)  a manager or member of a limited liability company who owned at least
20% of the limited liability company that had any type of license, agency, or
permit issued under this title revoked within the last three years.
(5) (a)  A minor may not be granted a restaurant liquor license.
(b)  The commission may not grant a restaurant liquor license to an applicant
that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company if any of the
following is a minor:
(i)  a partner or managing agent of the applicant partnership;
(ii)  a managing agent, officer, director, or stockholder who holds at least
20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the applicant corporation; or
(iii)  a manager or member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited
liability company.
(6)  If a person to whom a license has been issued under this part no longer
possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that
license, the commission may suspend or revoke that license.
(7)  The commission may not grant a restaurant liquor license to an applicant
who is not lawfully present in the United States.
